Hawaii, session 2026, SB3029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that fostering vibrant, sustainable, and livable communities can support the health, well-being, and connectivity of all residents.  Streets and public spaces are invaluable resources that, when adapted for multi-use purposes, can enhance community life by providing safe and inclusive opportunities for recreation, active transportation, and cultural engagement. In line with this vision, the State seeks to establish a summer streets program to reimagine urban spaces, drawing inspiration from the successful pilot program initiated in Malmo, Sweden in 2017. The legislature further finds that Malmo's program demonstrated the transformative power of temporarily repurposing streets and public spaces into dynamic areas for pedestrian use, cycling, and community-centered activities.  This initiative not only encouraged greater public participation and physical activity, but also bolstered local businesses and improved environmental outcomes.  By creating similar spaces across the State, the State can build stronger connections between residents, foster a sense of belonging, and promote healthier lifestyles. The State's unique geographic and cultural landscape offers a compelling opportunity to adapt and expand upon the Malmo model.  Beyond transforming streets, this initiative will emphasize the importance of creating accessible public spaces that act as hubs for social interaction, cultural events, and local markets.  These spaces will serve as central gathering points, enriching the lives of residents and supporting a stronger sense of community identity. The legislature believes that a program modeled after Malmo's program aligns with the State's goal of reducing carbon emissions, encouraging sustainable transportation, and promoting community health.  By prioritizing active lifestyles and providing equitable access to public spaces, the program will address public health challenges, such as physical inactivity, mental well-being, and social isolation, while supporting local businesses and reducing environmental impact. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require a county with a population of no greater than three hundred thousand, in collaboration with the Hawaii community development authority, to establish a summer streets pilot program that temporarily closes vehicular traffic and repurposes roads for pedestrian and cyclist uses; (2)  Require the Hawaii community development authority to select the county for the pilot program; (3)  Authorize the county to consult with the department of health regarding best practices for developing the pilot program; (4)  Require the county to submit an initial proposal to the executive director of the Hawaii community development authority; (5)  Require the Hawaii community development authority to submit a report to the Legislature; and (6)  Appropriate funds for the pilot program SECTION 2.  (a)  A county with a population of no greater than three hundred thousand, in collaboration with the Hawaii community development authority, shall establish a summer streets pilot program that temporarily closes vehicular traffic and repurposes roads for pedestrian and cyclist use, outdoor events, temporary installations, and other community-driven activities; provided that the Hawaii community development authority shall select one county for the pilot program. (b)  In developing the summer streets pilot program, the county shall identify and designate specific streets for pedestrianization, prioritizing areas that will best benefit from reduced vehicular traffic, and that are central to local commerce, cultural activities, and community engagement.  The summer streets pilot program shall support sustainable transportation options, including the provision of bike lanes and enhanced pedestrian pathways.  The county may consult with the department of health regarding the best practices for developing the pilot program. (c)  The county selected by the Hawaii community development authority shall submit an initial proposal for the summer streets pilot program, including locations, schedules for road closures, types of activities and amenities to be provided, and a breakdown of projected costs to the executive director of the Hawaii community development authority no later than December 31, 2026. (d)  The Hawaii community development authority shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii community development authority to allocate to the selected county for the summer streets pilot program required by this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii community development authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.